Arkansas, session 2025, SB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-8-107(a), concerning the expansion of
facilities and services under the Health Services Permit Agency, is amended
to read as follows:
(a)(1) Unless otherwise provided in this subchapter, all health
facilities seeking to add new beds or perform additional home health services
or to expand existing bed capacity shall apply for a permit approving
additional beds or services or expanded bed capacity or services pursuant to
procedures and criteria promulgated by the Health Services Permit Commission,
except an additional permit shall not be required for:
(A) Home home health services agencies currently licensed
by the Department of Health to expand geographic service areas if the home
health services agency has a primary or branch office located within one
hundred (100) miles of the location of the services; or
(B) Hospice agencies currently licensed by the Department
of Health to expand geographic service areas if the hospice agency has a
primary office, satellite office, or alternate delivery site located within
*JMB384*
03-04-2025 14:06:09 JMB384

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 SB269
one hundred (100) miles of the location of the services.
(2) A home health services agency or a hospice agency shall
provide notification to the Department of Health and the Health Services
Permit Agency forty-five (45) days in advance of adding an office location
from which the home health services agency or hospice agency plans to serve
within a one-hundred-mile area of the new location.
(3) The Department of Health and the Health Services Permit
Agency shall record any expansion in service area in its publicly distributed
records.
(4) A home health service agency or a hospice agency that is
providing services outside of a permitted service area shall be subject to
appropriate penalties under § 20-7-101 and § 20-10-803.

/s/C. Penzo






















03-04-2025 14:06:09 JMB384